Wisconsin, session 2025, SB480.
do enact as follows:SB480,11Section 1. 66.1105 (4) (gm) 4. c. of the statutes is amended to read:SB480,2,14266.1105 (4) (gm) 4. c. Except as provided in subs. (10) (c), (16) (d), (17), (18) (c) 33., (20) (b), and (20m) (d) 1., and (21) (g), the equalized value of taxable property of 4the district plus the value increment of all existing districts does not exceed 12 5percent of the total equalized value of taxable property within the city. In 6determining the equalized value of taxable property under this subd. 4. c., the 7department of revenue shall base its calculations on the most recent equalized 8value of taxable property of the district that is reported under s. 70.57 (1m) before 9the date on which the resolution under this paragraph is adopted. If the 10department of revenue determines that a local legislative body exceeds the 12 11percent limit described in this subd. 4. c., the department shall notify the city of its 12noncompliance, in writing, not later than December 31 of the year in which the 13department receives the completed application or amendment forms described in 14sub. (5) (b).SB480,215Section 2. 66.1105 (21) of the statutes is created to read:SB480,3,21666.1105 (21) Residential tax incremental districts. (a) A city may create 1a tax incremental district as a residential tax incremental district if all of the 2following apply:SB480,3,731. The local legislative body adopts a resolution assigning a name to the 4district for identification purposes. The first district created under this subsection 5shall be known as “Residential Tax Incremental District Number One, City of ....” 6Each subsequently created residential tax incremental district shall be assigned 7the next consecutive number.SB480,3,882. The local legislative body adopts a resolution finding all of the following:SB480,3,99a. The project plan complies with par. (b).SB480,3,1010b. All project costs are for expenditures authorized under par. (c).SB480,3,1211c. All project costs will be paid directly under sub. (9) (a) 1. or financed by a 12developer.SB480,3,1613d. The equalized value of taxable property of the residential tax incremental 14district plus the value increment of all existing residential tax incremental districts 15does not exceed 3 percent of the total equalized value of taxable property within the 16city.SB480,3,19173. The clerk of the local legislative body certifies the resolution under subd. 2. 18and forwards a copy of the certified resolution to the department of revenue and the 19joint review board.SB480,3,21204. The joint review board approves the creation of the tax incremental district 21as a residential tax incremental district.SB480,3,24225. The city establishes in the resolution under subd. 2. or by ordinance all of 23the following with regard to residential developments that meet the requirements 24under par. (b) within the district:SB480,4,21a. The maximum amount of development-related fees that may be charged by 2the city for a development.SB480,4,43b. The architectural and construction requirements that will apply to a 4development.SB480,4,75(b) All public works, improvements, and project costs included in the project 6plan for a residential tax incremental district shall be related to residential 7developments that satisfy all of the following:SB480,4,981. The development consists entirely of single-family or 2-family residences 9that are owner-occupied.SB480,4,10102. The lot size of each single-family residence is less than 7,500 square feet.SB480,4,11113. The lot size of each 2-family residence is 15,000 square feet or less.SB480,4,12124. The lot width of each residential lot is 70 feet or less.SB480,4,13135. No side setback is greater than 10 feetSB480,4,14146. No single-story residence is larger than 1,500 square feet.SB480,4,15157. No 2-story residence is larger than 2,000 square feet.SB480,4,2216(c) Notwithstanding sub. (2) (f), project costs for a residential tax incremental 17district may include only costs, including financing costs, related to the construction 18or improvement of infrastructure necessary for residential developments within the 19district. Project costs for a residential tax incremental district may include costs 20related to stormwater only to the extent that the costs are for improvements related 21to providing service to the entire residential tax incremental district and not to 22individual lots.SB480,5,223(d) 1. All project costs for a residential tax incremental district shall be paid 1directly under sub. (9) (a) 1. from tax increments generated by the residential tax 2incremental district or financed by a developer.SB480,5,432. All payments made by a city to a developer for financing a residential tax 4incremental district shall be made under sub. (9) (a) 1.SB480,5,85(e) Notwithstanding sub. (4) (h) 1. and (4m) (a), with regard to a residential 6tax incremental district, a project plan may not be amended to increase the project 7costs of the district later than 10 years before the unextended termination date of 8the district except upon unanimous vote of the joint review board.SB480,5,119(f) Notwithstanding sub. (6) (d), (e), or (f), a residential tax incremental 10district may not become a donor district or receive tax increments from a donor 11district. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb480 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb480 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB480 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB480 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB480: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting